District of Columbia statutes.
47-1805.05

Returns — Certification by Qualified High Technology Company.

(a)

Certification. —

Except as otherwise provided herein, to claim a credit or other benefit under this title as a Qualified High Technology Company, a Qualified High Technology Company shall attach to its applicable tax return an original affidavit certifying that it is a Qualified High Technology Company.

(b)

A taxpayer which certifies that is a Qualified High Technology Company shall be subject to audit, to the same extent as any other taxpayer, to verify that the taxpayer qualified as a Qualified High Technology Company.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-256, § 101(b)(2), 48 DCR 730